Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.080

Verdict.

Upon the close of the evidence, and the argument of counsel, the court shall instruct the jury as to the matters submitted to them, and the law pertaining thereto, whereupon the jury shall retire and deliberate and determine upon the amount of compensation in money that shall be paid to the owner or owners of the real estate sought to be taken for such schoolhouse site purposes therefor, which shall be the amount found by the jury to be the fair and full value of such premises; and when the jury shall have determined upon their verdict, they shall return the same to the court as in other civil actions.

[ 1909 p 374 s 8; 1903 c 111 s 8; RRS s 913.]

NOTES:

Trial, civil actions, rendering of verdict: Chapter 4.44 RCW.